NepaliNLPWeb/WebContent/references/spellchecker_mpp/ne_NP.dic
अजम्मरी/15,22,18
अत्याउ/9,17
अत्यासलाग्दो/14
अधुरो/14
अनदी/15,22,18
अनुपराज/18,22,15
अनुपस्थिति/15,22,18
अभिज्ञान/15,22,18
अभिजातवर्ग/18,22,15
अभेकिलो/14
अरर्याउ/9,17
अर्को/19
अर्माली/15,22,18
अर्याल/15,22,18
अर्सा/15,22,18
अलचिलो/14
अल्झाइ/8,17
शुद्ध/24
असमञ्जस/15,22,18
असमानता/18,22,15
आँखालाग्दो/14
आगलागी/15,22,18
आग्लो/18,22,15
आफैँ/16
आम्दानी/18,22,15
आम्स्टडम/15,22,18
आसय/18,22,15
आस्तिकता/15,22,18
इत्तरो/14
ईश्वर/18,22,15
उँचाइ/15,22,18
उक्ल/8,17
उक्साउ/9,17
उचेरि/8,17
उड्दो/14
उडाउ/9,17
उत्राइ/8,17
उनन्साठी/15,22,18
उन्‍यु/15,22,18
उनी/16,18
उब्जिलो/14
उब्रि/8,17
उम्त्याउ/9,17
उम्लि/8,17
उलामाला/15,22,18
उवासंघ/18,22,15
उषा/18,22,15
उस्तो/14
उहाँ/15,22,18,16,18
उही/16
एकोहरो/14
एकोहोर्याइ/8,17
एसएलसी/15,22,18
एसएसबी/15,22,18
एस्कीमो/15,22,18
ओछ्याउ/9,17
ओथि/8,17
कक्र्याउ/9,17
कच्चो/14
कज्याउ/9,17
कट्ठा/15,22,18
कटाइ/15,22,18
कटारी/15,22,18
कनिक्याइ/8,17
कमलो/14
कमीसनर/18,22,15
कमेज/15,22,18
कमैया/18,22,15
कल्पाउ/9,17
कस/16
कहि/8,17
क्याटलग/18,22,15
क्यान/15,22,18
क्यान्टिन/18,22,15
काँचो/14
काँढामूढा/18,22,15
काँस/15,22,18
काइदा/18,22,15
कार्यदल/18,22,15
कार्यनीति/15,22,18
कार्यभार/15,22,18
किसान/18,22,15
किसिम/18,22,15
कीर्ति/15,22,18
कुँदाउ/9,17
कुचुर्क्याउ/9,17
कुन/13
कुप्र्याइ/8,17
कुसँस्कार/18,22,15
कुसुन्डो/15,22,18
कुहिनो/15,22,18
के/23
कैलो/14
को/16
कोक्याउ/9,17
कोचाउ/9,17
कोसी/15,22,18
कोसो/15,22,18
कौडिन्य/15,22,18
खट्क/8,17
खत्याउ/9,17
खम्सि/8,17
खर्चिलो/14
खाँज/18,22,15
खाँदिलो/14
खाँबो/15,22,18
खाका/18,22,15
खिँचाइ/8,17
खिचाउ/9,17
खिहिरो/14
खुम्‌र्याउ/9,17
खुलाउ/9,17
खेराउ/9,17
खोक्रो/14
खोकिला/18,22,15
खोकी/15,22,18
खोजी/18,22,15
खोल्स्याइ/8,17
खोल्स्याउ/9,17
ग/10
गँथ्याइ/8,17
गडगड्याउ/9,17
गतिलो/14
गप्फ्याउ/9,17
गयल/15,22,18
गरगहना/18,22,15
न्यानो/23
गर्जनतर्जन/15,22,18
गहकिलो/14
गान्टो/14
गिज्याउ/9,17
गीतिचेत/15,22,18
गुँड/18,22,15
गुट/18,22,15
गुडि/8,17
गुनिलो/14
गुमाउ/9,17
गोरो/14
गोल्याइ/8,17
घृणा/18,22,15
घच्चा/18,22,15
घटनास्थल/18,22,15
घस्काउ/9,17
घस्टि/8,17
घिडघिडो/14
घुँगुर्कि/8,17
घुम्‌र्याउ/9,17
घोपिलो/14
घोस्याउ/9,17
ङिस्याइ/8,17
चन्दन/18,22,15
चम्किलो/14
चहर्याउ/9,17
चाक्लोबाक्लो/14
चिघ्राउ/9,17
चिनी/15,22,18
चिनो/18,22,15
चिप्लोचाप्लो/14
चिम्टा/18,22,15
चिल्लाउ/9,17
चुकअमिलो/14
चुठाइ/8,17
चुर्याउ/9,17
चेप्टो/14
चोपि/8,17
चोबलाउ/9,17
छकटो/14
छमाउ/9,17
छ्याप/8,17
छिचरो/14
छिनाउ/9,17
छुट्टी/15,22,18
छुट्याइ/8,17
छुमछुम/15,22,18
छुवाछुत/15,22,18
छेराउ/9,17
छो/10
छोटो/14
जर्काउ/9,17
जस/16
जहरिलो/14
जा/11
जाई/15,22,18
जागृत/15,22,18
जागीर/18,22,15
जिन्डो/14
जुन/13
जुम्सो/14
जुराउ/9,17
जे/13
जो/16
जोराउ/9,17
झप्क्याउ/9,17
झर्रो/14
झिँजि/8,17
झिलिमिली/15,22,18
झिसिलो/14
झुकाउ/15,22,18
झुकाउ/9,17
झुत्तो/18,22,15
टँक्याउ/9,17
टँगरो/14
टँगाइ/8,17
टस्काउ/9,17
टिबटो/14
टुइँक्याइ/8,17
टेराउ/9,17
ठर्रो/14
ठस्याउ/9,17
ठहर्याउ/9,17
डँडाउ/9,17
डकार/15,22,18
डकैती/18,22,15
डटाउ/9,17
डडेलधुरा/15,22,18
डढुल्लो/14
डेब्रो/14
डोर्याउ/9,17
ढुकाउ/9,17
तछाउ/9,17
तत्काल/19
तपाईँ/18,22,15,16,13
तमतमाउँदो/14
तयार/15,22,18
तर/15,22,18
तरबार/18,22,15
तहरि/8,17
त्यस/22,19,13
त्यहाँ/13
त्यही/16
त्यो/16
तात्तातो/14
तिनी/16,18
तुइँक्याउ/9,17
तुर्क्याइलो/14
तौलसमूह/18,22,15
थकान/15,22,18
थच्याउ/9,17
थतर्क्याइलो/14
थि/10
थुप्राउ/9,17
दँतुलो/14
दगल्च्याइ/8,17
दम्काउ/9,17
दर्बिलो/14
दरोगा/15,22,18
दलगत/15,22,18
दलान/15,22,18
दुम्स्यैलो/14
दुहाइ/8,17
देउडा/18,22,15
देउता/18,22,15
देवक/15,22,18
दौडाउ/9,17
धतुलो/14
धिप्क/8,17
धिप्काउ/9,17
धो/10
नक्कली/15,22,18
नक्षत्र/18,22,15
नखरमाउलो/14
नगर/15,22,18
नपाउ/9,17
निखारि/8,17
निदाइलो/14
निब/15,22,18
निबन्ध/18,22,15
निब्ट्याउ/9,17
निमावि/15,22,18
निस्तो/14
निसास्याउ/9,17
नेपो/14
पक्डाउ/9,17
पचपचाउँदो/14
पठनपाठन/15,22,18
पठाउ/9,17
पठान/15,22,18
पढाउ/9,17
पतरी/15,22,18
परको/14
पस्‌र्याउ/9,17
पसाइ/8,17
प्याकेट/18,22,15
प्याज/15,22,18
प्यास/15,22,18
प्रावि/18,22,15
प्राविधिक/18,22,15
प्रेत/18,22,15
पाँजुलो/14
पिटाउ/9,17
पिसोलि/8,17
पीताम्बर/15,22,18
पीप/15,22,18
पुङमाङ/18,22,15
पुस्टाउ/9,17
फँडाउ/9,17
फकाउ/9,17
फतरो/14
फलेदो/15,22,18
फसल/15,22,18
फ्रिडम/15,22,18
फिँजाउ/9,17
फिटाइ/8,17
फुकौरो/14
फुसुल्ट्याउ/9,17
फेरि/8,17
बछाउ/9,17
बद्लाइ/8,17
बन्डल/18,22,15
बन्द/15,22,18
बन्दीघर/18,22,15
बरालाउ/9,17
बाक्लो/14
बाटुल्याइ/8,17
बालगृह/18,22,15
बालचर/15,22,18
बालाजी/15,22,18
बिच्काउ/9,17
बिभिन्डो/14
बिल्झाइ/8,17
बिसाउ/9,17
बेल्जियम/15,22,18
बेला/15,22,18
बेलाउ/9,17
बेले/15,22,18
बोराउ/9,17
बोस्याइलो/14
भ/10
भट्ट्याउ/9,17
भाँचि/8,17
भाम्टो/15,22,18
भारत/15,22,18
भारा/15,22,18
छुत/24
भिराउ/9,17
भोको/14
भोलि/13
मच्काउ/9,17
मझाइ/8,17
मण्डली/15,22,18
मतदाता/18,22,15
मत्स्‍य/18,22,15
मलाउ/9,17
महँगो/14
म्याट्रिक्स/15,22,18
म्यानचेस्टर/15,22,18
म्युनिख/15,22,18
माडि/8,17
मिल्नु/15,22,18,20
मुख/15,22,18
मुखर्जी/15,22,18
मुगा/15,22,18
मुताउ/9,17
मैल्याउ/9,17
यस/15,21
यसपटक/13
यही/16
यो/16
योगदान/15,22,18
योगमाया/15,22,18
यौनसम्बन्ध/15,22,18
रँगेलाउ/9,17
रखवालो/14
रमाइ/8,17
रमाउ/9,17
रामेछाप/15,22,18
रामेश/15,22,18
राष्ट्रपति/18,22,15
रेटाउ/9,17
रेतिलो/14
रो/10
रोजाइ/8,17
लट्काउ/9,17
लम्काइ/8,17
लम्च्याइलो/14
ललाउ/9,17
लसपस/15,22,18
ल्यापटप/18,22,15
लुत्ति/8,17
लुतेङ्ग्रो/14
लेखाउ/9,17
वकालतनामा/15,22,18
वटवृक्ष/18,22,15
वान/15,22,18
वायुवेग/15,22,18
वियोग/15,22,18
विरक्ति/15,22,18
विरुद्ध/15,22,18
वैदिक/24
वैलाउ/9,17
शपथग्रहण/15,22,18
शब्दकुञ्जी/15,22,18
शर्मिला/18,22,15
शान्त/15,22,18,24
शास्त्रीय/24
शिक्षित/24
शिव/15,22,18,24
शिष्ट/24
शुचि/24
शुभ/15,22,18,24
सँगलाउ/9,17
सइन/18,22,15
सक्कल/15,22,18
सगसग/15,22,18
सजिलो/14
सपाइ/8,17
सभा/18,22,15
सभापति/18,22,15
समरजङ्ग/15,22,18
निकट/23
समेत/23
सर्काउ/9,17
सह-सेनानी/18,22,15
सहकारी/18,22,15
सहभागी/18,22,19
सहमरण/15,22,18
स्थिर/24
साँचो/14
साना/18,22,15
सापट/15,22,18
सामन्त/18,22,15
सामान्य/24,18,22,15
सिँचाउ/9,17
सिट्ठो/14
सिलिन्डर/18,22,15
सिलोक/18,22,15
सीता/18,22,15
सुम्लि/8,17
सुरू/19,21
सुल्काउ/9,17
सोनु/15,22,18
सोम/15,22,18
सौरभ/18,22,15
हर्काउ/9,17
हाता/15,22,18
हानी/15,22,18
हासिल/15,22,18
हुक्राउ/9,17
हुनसम्मको/14
होइ/11
होचि/8,17
भए/21
आसाङपाटी/15,22,18
इजुङ/15,22,18
उग्रतारा/15,22,18
खोपिगाउँ/15,22,18
खोप्रे/15,22,18
ख्वप/15,22,18
जलजलाधुरी/15,22,18
जामुने/15,22,18
जोमसोम/15,22,18
दब्रे/15,22,18
दरौं/15,22,18
दारे/15,22,18
पहिले/23
पादुकाखोला/15,22,18
पापकुण्ड/15,22,18
पिरनीबारी/15,22,18
भन्सारहिटी/15,22,18
भाजङ्गाल/15,22,18
भीमनगर/15,22,18
रमिते/15,22,18
राउते/15,22,18
राप्ती/15,22,18
साकफारा/15,22,18
साङबुङ/15,22,18
साप्तेन/15,22,18
हिरिङटार/15,22,18
हृषिकेश/15,22,18
पुष्पाञ्जलि/22
अष्टाध्यायी/23
बफादारी/23
वसु/23
